Generated/uz.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ax 0 simonigami .
SFX Ax 0 simonigachi .
SFX Ax 0 simonigadir .
SFX Ax 0 simonigada .
SFX Ax 0 simonigaku .
SFX Ax 0 simonigamikan .
SFX Ax 0 simonigamidi .
SFX Ax 0 simonigadirda .
SFX Ax 0 simonigachami .
SFX Ax 0 simonigachachi .
SFX Ax 0 simonigachadir .
SFX Ax 0 simonigachada .
SFX Ax 0 simonigachaku .
SFX Ax 0 simonigachamikan .
SFX Ax 0 simonigachamidi .
SFX Ax 0 simonigachadirda .

# OT/KO'PLIK : LAR:1SHB:TSH:MI?
SFX Ay Y 320
SFX Ay 0 larimnimi .
SFX Ay 0 larimnichi .
SFX Ay 0 larimnidir .
SFX Ay 0 larimnida .
SFX Ay 0 larimniku .
SFX Ay 0 larimnimikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimnimidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimnidirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimningmi .
SFX Ay 0 larimningchi .
SFX Ay 0 larimningdir .
SFX Ay 0 larimningda .
SFX Ay 0 larimningku .
SFX Ay 0 larimningmikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimningmidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimningdirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimdami .
SFX Ay 0 larimdachi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdadir .
SFX Ay 0 larimdada .
SFX Ay 0 larimdaku .
SFX Ay 0 larimdamikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimdamidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdadirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimdanmi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdanchi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdandir .
SFX Ay 0 larimdanda .
SFX Ay 0 larimdanku .
SFX Ay 0 larimdanmikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimdanmidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdandirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagimi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagichi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidir .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagida .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagiku .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagimikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagimidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidekmi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidekchi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidekdir .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidekda .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidekku .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidekmikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidekmidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimdagidekdirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimgami .
SFX Ay 0 larimgachi .
SFX Ay 0 larimgadir .
SFX Ay 0 larimgada .
SFX Ay 0 larimgaku .
SFX Ay 0 larimgamikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimgamidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimgadirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimgachami .
SFX Ay 0 larimgachachi .
SFX Ay 0 larimgachadir .
SFX Ay 0 larimgachada .
SFX Ay 0 larimgachaku .
SFX Ay 0 larimgachamikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimgachamidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimgachadirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimiznimi .
SFX Ay 0 larimiznichi .
SFX Ay 0 larimiznidir .
SFX Ay 0 larimiznida .
SFX Ay 0 larimizniku .
SFX Ay 0 larimiznimikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimiznimidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimiznidirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizningmi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizningchi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizningdir .
SFX Ay 0 larimizningda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizningku .
SFX Ay 0 larimizningmikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimizningmidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizningdirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdami .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdachi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdadir .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdada .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdaku .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdamikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdamidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdadirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdanmi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdanchi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdandir .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdanda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdanku .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdanmikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdanmidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdandirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagimi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagichi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidir .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagida .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagiku .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagimikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagimidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidekmi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidekchi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidekdir .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidekda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidekku .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidekmikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidekmidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizdagidekdirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgami .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgachi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgadir .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgada .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgaku .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgamikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgamidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgadirda .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgachami .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgachachi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgachadir .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgachada .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgachaku .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgachamikan .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgachamidi .
SFX Ay 0 larimizgachadirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringnimi .
SFX Ay 0 laringnichi .
SFX Ay 0 laringnidir .
SFX Ay 0 laringnida .
SFX Ay 0 laringniku .
SFX Ay 0 laringnimikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringnimidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringnidirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringningmi .
SFX Ay 0 laringningchi .
SFX Ay 0 laringningdir .
SFX Ay 0 laringningda .
SFX Ay 0 laringningku .
SFX Ay 0 laringningmikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringningmidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringningdirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringdami .
SFX Ay 0 laringdachi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdadir .
SFX Ay 0 laringdada .
SFX Ay 0 laringdaku .
SFX Ay 0 laringdamikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringdamidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdadirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringdanmi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdanchi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdandir .
SFX Ay 0 laringdanda .
SFX Ay 0 laringdanku .
SFX Ay 0 laringdanmikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringdanmidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdandirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagimi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagichi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidir .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagida .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagiku .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagimikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagimidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidekmi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidekchi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidekdir .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidekda .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidekku .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidekmikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidekmidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringdagidekdirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringgami .
SFX Ay 0 laringgachi .
SFX Ay 0 laringgadir .
SFX Ay 0 laringgada .
SFX Ay 0 laringgaku .
SFX Ay 0 laringgamikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringgamidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringgadirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringgachami .
SFX Ay 0 laringgachachi .
SFX Ay 0 laringgachadir .
SFX Ay 0 laringgachada .
SFX Ay 0 laringgachaku .
SFX Ay 0 laringgachamikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringgachamidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringgachadirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringiznimi .
SFX Ay 0 laringiznichi .
SFX Ay 0 laringiznidir .
SFX Ay 0 laringiznida .
SFX Ay 0 laringizniku .
SFX Ay 0 laringiznimikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringiznimidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringiznidirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizningmi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizningchi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizningdir .
SFX Ay 0 laringizningda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizningku .
SFX Ay 0 laringizningmikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringizningmidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizningdirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdami .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdachi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdadir .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdada .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdaku .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdamikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdamidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdadirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdanmi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdanchi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdandir .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdanda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdanku .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdanmikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdanmidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdandirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagimi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagichi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidir .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagida .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagiku .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagimikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagimidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidekmi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidekchi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidekdir .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidekda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidekku .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidekmikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidekmidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizdagidekdirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgami .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgachi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgadir .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgada .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgaku .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgamikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgamidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgadirda .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgachami .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgachachi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgachadir .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgachada .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgachaku .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgachamikan .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgachamidi .
SFX Ay 0 laringizgachadirda .
SFX Ay 0 larinimi .
SFX Ay 0 larinichi .
SFX Ay 0 larinidir .
SFX Ay 0 larinida .
SFX Ay 0 lariniku .
SFX Ay 0 larinimikan .
SFX Ay 0 larinimidi .
SFX Ay 0 larinidirda .
SFX Ay 0 lariningmi .
SFX Ay 0 lariningchi .
SFX Ay 0 lariningdir .
SFX Ay 0 lariningda .
SFX Ay 0 lariningku .
SFX Ay 0 lariningmikan .
SFX Ay 0 lariningmidi .
SFX Ay 0 lariningdirda .
SFX Ay 0 laridami .
SFX Ay 0 laridachi .
SFX Ay 0 laridadir .
SFX Ay 0 laridada .
SFX Ay 0 laridaku .
SFX Ay 0 laridamikan .
SFX Ay 0 laridamidi .
SFX Ay 0 laridadirda .
SFX Ay 0 laridanmi .
SFX Ay 0 laridanchi .
SFX Ay 0 laridandir .
SFX Ay 0 laridanda .
SFX Ay 0 laridanku .
SFX Ay 0 laridanmikan .
SFX Ay 0 laridanmidi .
SFX Ay 0 laridandirda .
SFX Ay 0 laridagimi .
SFX Ay 0 laridagichi .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidir .
SFX Ay 0 laridagida .
SFX Ay 0 laridagiku .
SFX Ay 0 laridagimikan .
SFX Ay 0 laridagimidi .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidirda .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidekmi .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidekchi .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidekdir .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidekda .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidekku .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidekmikan .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidekmidi .
SFX Ay 0 laridagidekdirda .
SFX Ay 0 larigami .
SFX Ay 0 larigachi .
SFX Ay 0 larigadir .
SFX Ay 0 larigada .
SFX Ay 0 larigaku .
SFX Ay 0 larigamikan .
SFX Ay 0 larigamidi .
SFX Ay 0 larigadirda .
SFX Ay 0 larigachami .
SFX Ay 0 larigachachi .
SFX Ay 0 larigachadir .
SFX Ay 0 larigachada .
SFX Ay 0 larigachaku .
SFX Ay 0 larigachamikan .
SFX Ay 0 larigachamidi .
SFX Ay 0 larigachadirda .
